Washington statutes.
RCW 11.68.085

Nonintervention powers—Generally.

A personal representative with nonintervention powers may administer and settle the estate without supervision or intervention by the court except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

[ 2021 c 140 s 4006.]

NOTES:

Application—2021 c 140 ss 4003-4017, 4023, 4024, and 4026: See note following RCW 11.48.130.